Wisconsin, session 2025, SB818.
do enact as follows:SB818,11Section 1. 36.64 (4) (e) of the statutes is created to read:SB818,2,5236.64 (4) (e) Designate the operator of a charter school authorized under s. 3118.40 (2x) as a demonstration public school operator if the operator demonstrates 4to the director of the office of educational opportunity that for each of its charter 5schools authorized under s. 118.40 (2x), the operator does all of the following:SB818,3,211. Documents and disseminates best practices for the charter school’s 2educational model with other schools in this state.SB818,3,432. Provides professional development opportunities for teachers and school 4administrators.SB818,3,653. Participates in a longitudinal study of the charter school’s educational 6model.SB818,3,774. Evaluates the effectiveness of the charter school’s educational model.SB818,3,885. Tracks the progress of pupils who matriculate from the charter school.SB818,3,996. Establishes and maintains partnerships with community organizations.SB818,3,11107. Enters into an agreement with all of the following to evaluate the design 11and implementation of the charter school’s educational model:SB818,3,1212a. The Wisconsin Center for Educational Research.SB818,3,1313b. The Wisconsin Evaluation Collaborative.SB818,214Section 2. 36.64 (4m) of the statutes is created to read:SB818,3,191536.64 (4m) (a) If an operator of a charter school submits a request to the 16director of the office of educational opportunity for designation as a demonstration 17public school operator under sub. (4) (e), the director shall respond to the request, in 18writing, by no later than 30 days after receiving the request. The director shall 19include in its response under this subsection all of the following:SB818,3,21201. Whether or not the director intends to make the designation and if not, the 21director’s reason for not making the designation.SB818,3,22222. The term of the designation, as specified in par. (b).SB818,4,223(b) The term of a designation as a demonstration public school operator under 1sub. (4) (e) may be for any term not exceeding 5 school years and may be renewed for 2one or more terms not exceeding 5 school years. Each term shall begin on July 1.SB818,4,73(c) If the director of the office of educational opportunity designates an 4operator as a demonstration public school operator under sub. (4) (e), for a charter 5school operated by the demonstration public school operator to qualify for the 6additional per pupil amount under s. 118.40 (2x) (e) 1., the director and the operator 7shall include in the contract under s. 118.40 (2x) all of the following:SB818,4,981. A requirement for the operator to continue to comply with the requirements 9in sub. (4) (e) 1. to 7. for the term of the designation.SB818,4,13102. A requirement for the operator to submit to the director, the department of 11public instruction, the joint committee on finance, and the appropriate standing 12committees of the legislature under s. 13.172 (3) an annual comprehensive report 13that includes at least all of the following:SB818,4,1414a. Audited financial statements.SB818,4,1615b. The sections of the director’s annual report under s. 118.40 (3m) (f) for the 16previous school year that pertain to the charter school.SB818,4,1717c. Longitudinal study findings from the previous year.SB818,4,1818d. Pupil achievement information from the previous school year.SB818,4,2019e. Enrollment information about pupils attending the school, including 20demographic information.SB818,4,2121f. Staff retention information.SB818,4,2222g. Information about family engagement.SB818,4,2423h. Information about how pupils transition to secondary school or to post-24secondary school or careers, whichever is applicable.SB818,5,21(d) Annually, by June 30, the director shall submit to the department of public 2instruction all of the following:SB818,5,531. The name of each operator designated by the director as a demonstration 4public school operator during the current school year and the term of the 5designation.SB818,5,862. Each charter school operated by the demonstration public school operator 7that qualifies for the additional per pupil amount under s. 118.40 (2x) (e) 1. during 8the term of the designation.SB818,39Section 3. 118.40 (2x) (a) 1. of the statutes is renumbered 118.40 (2x) (a) 1s.SB818,410Section 4. 118.40 (2x) (a) 1m. of the statutes is created to read:SB818,5,1311118.40 (2x) (a) 1m. “Demonstration public school operator” means an operator 12of a charter school under this subsection that is designated as a demonstration 13public charter school operator by the director under s. 36.64 (4) (e).SB818,514Section 5. 118.40 (2x) (e) 1. of the statutes is renumbered 118.40 (2x) (e) 1. a.SB818,615Section 6. 118.40 (2x) (e) 1. b. of the statutes is created to read:SB818,6,316118.40 (2x) (e) 1. b. Beginning in the 2026-27 school year, the department 17shall pay a demonstration public school operator $6,863 in addition to the amount 18specified in subd. 1. a. for each pupil attending a charter school operated by the 19demonstration public school operator that qualifies for the payment under this 20subd. 1. b. in the annual notice submitted to the department under s. 36.64 (4m). 21Beginning in the 2027-28 school year, the additional per pupil amount paid to a 22demonstration public school operator under this subd. 1. b. is the sum of the 23additional per pupil amount under this subd. 1. b. for the previous school year; the 24amount of the per pupil revenue limit adjustment under s. 121.91 (2m) for the 1current school year, if positive; and the change in the amount of statewide 2categorical aid per pupil between the previous school year and the current school 3year, as determined under sub. (2r) (e) 2p., if positive.SB818,74Section 7. 118.40 (2x) (f) 1. a. of the statutes is amended to read:SB818,6,65118.40 (2x) (f) 1. a. Determine the number of pupils residing in the school 6district for whom a payment is made under par. (e) 1. a. in that school year.SB818,87Section 8. 118.40 (2x) (f) 1. b. of the statutes is amended to read:SB818,6,98118.40 (2x) (f) 1. b. Multiply the number of pupils under subd. 1. a. by the per 9pupil amount calculated under par. (e) 1. a. for that school year.SB818,6,1010